Nebraska, session 109, LB287.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 14-102, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
14-102 In addition to the powers granted in section 14-101, cities
of the metropolitan class shall have power by ordinance:
(1) To levy any tax or special assessment authorized by law;
(2) To provide a corporate seal for the use of the city, and also
any official seal for the use of any officer, board, or agent of the
city, whose duties require an official seal to be used. Such corporate
seal shall be used in the execution of municipal bonds, warrants,
conveyances, and other instruments and proceedings as required by law;
(3) To provide all needful rules and regulations for the protection
and preservation of health within the city, including providing for the
enforcement of the use of water from public water supplies when the use
of water from other sources shall be deemed unsafe;
(4) To appropriate money and provide for the payment of debts and
expenses of the city;
(5) To adopt all such measures as may be deemed necessary for the
accommodation and protection of strangers and the traveling public in
person and property;
(6) To punish and prevent the discharge of firearms, fireworks, or
explosives of any description within the city, other than the discharge
of firearms at a shooting range pursuant to the Nebraska Shooting Range
Protection Act;
(7) To regulate the inspection and sale of meats, flour, poultry,
fish, milk, vegetables, and all other provisions or articles of food
exposed or offered for sale in the city;
(8) To require all elected or appointed officers to give bond and
security for the faithful performance of their duties, except that no
officer shall become bonded and secured upon the official bond of another
or upon any bond executed to the city;
(9) To require from any officer of the city at any time a report, in
-2-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
detail, of the transactions of his or her office or any matter connected
with such office;
(10) To provide for the prevention of cruelty to children and
animals;
(11) To regulate, license, or prohibit the running at large of dogs
and other animals within the city as well as in areas within the
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city; to guard against
injuries or annoyance from such dogs and other animals; and to authorize
the destruction of such dogs and other animals when running at large
contrary to the provisions of any ordinance. Any licensing provision
shall comply with subsection (2) of section 54-603 for service animals;
(12) To provide for keeping sidewalks clean and free from
obstructions and accumulations; to provide for the assessment and
collection of taxes on real estate and for the sale and conveyance
thereof; and to pay the expenses of keeping the sidewalk adjacent to such
real estate clean and free from obstructions and accumulations as
provided by law;
(13) To provide for the planting and protection of shade or
ornamental and useful trees upon streets or boulevards; to assess the
cost of such trees to the extent of benefits upon the abutting property
as a special assessment; to provide for the protection of birds and
animals and their nests; to provide for the trimming of trees located
upon streets and boulevards or when the branches of trees overhang
streets and boulevards when in the judgment of the mayor and city council
such trimming is made necessary to properly light such street or
boulevard or to furnish proper police protection; and to assess the cost
of such trimming upon the abutting property as a special assessment;
(14) To provide for, regulate, and require the numbering or
renumbering of houses along public streets or avenues; and to care for
and control and to name and rename streets, avenues, parks, and squares
within the city;
-3-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
(15) To require weeds and worthless vegetation growing upon any lot
or piece of ground within the city or its extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction to be cut and destroyed so as to abate any nuisance
occasioned by such vegetation; to prohibit and control the throwing,
depositing, or accumulation of litter on any lot or piece of ground
within the city or its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction; to require
the removal of such litter so as to abate any nuisance occasioned
thereby. If the owner fails to cut and destroy weeds and worthless
vegetation or remove litter, or both, after notice as required by
ordinance, the city may assess the cost of such destruction or removal
upon the lots or lands as a special assessment. The required notice may
be by publication in the official newspaper of the city and may be
directed in general terms to the owners of lots and lands affected
without naming such owners;
(16) To prohibit and regulate the running at large or the herding or
driving of domestic animals, such as hogs, cattle, horses, sheep, goats,
fowls, or animals of any kind or description within the corporate limits;
to provide for the impounding of all animals running at large, herded, or
driven contrary to such prohibition and regulations; and to provide for
the forfeiture and sale of animals impounded to pay the expense of taking
up, caring for, and selling such impounded animals, including the cost of
advertising and fees of officers;
(17) To regulate the transportation of articles through the streets
and to prevent injuries to the streets from overloaded vehicles;
(18) To prevent or regulate any amusement or practice having a
tendency to annoy persons passing in the streets or on the sidewalks; and
to regulate the use of vehicles propelled by steam, gas, electricity, or
other motive power, operated on the streets of the city;
(19) To regulate or prohibit the transportation and keeping of
gunpowder, oils, and other combustible and explosive articles;
(20) To regulate, license, or prohibit the sale of domestic animals
-4-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
or of goods, wares, and merchandise at public auction on the streets,
alleys, highways, or any public ground within the city;
(21) To regulate and prevent the use of streets, sidewalks, and
public grounds for signs, posts, awnings, awning posts, scales, or other
like purposes; and to regulate and prohibit the exhibition or carrying or
conveying of banners, placards, advertisements, or the distribution or
posting of advertisements or handbills in the streets or public grounds
or upon the sidewalks;
(22) To provide for the punishment of persons disturbing the peace
by noise, intoxication, drunkenness, or fighting, or otherwise violating
the public peace by indecent or disorderly conduct or by lewd and
lascivious behavior;
(23) To provide for the punishment of vagrants, tramps, street
beggars, prostitutes, disturbers of the peace, pickpockets, gamblers,
burglars, thieves, persons who practice any game, trick, or device with
intent to swindle, and trespassers upon private property;
(24) To prohibit, restrain, and suppress houses of prostitution,
opium joints, gambling houses, prize fighting, dog fighting, cock
fighting, and other disorderly houses and practices, all games and
gambling, and all kinds of indecencies; to regulate and license or
prohibit the keeping and use of billiard tables, bowling alleys, shooting
galleries except as provided in the Nebraska Shooting Range Protection
Act, and other similar places of amusement; and to prohibit and suppress
all lotteries and gift enterprises of all kinds under whatsoever name
carried on, except that nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
apply to bingo, lotteries, lotteries by the sale of pickle cards, or
raffles conducted in accordance with the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska
Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the
Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, or the State Lottery Act;
(25) To make and enforce all police regulations for the good
government, general welfare, health, safety, and security of the city and
-5-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
the citizens of the city in addition to the police powers expressly
granted by law; in the exercise of the police power, to pass all needful
and proper ordinances and impose fines, forfeitures, and penalties for
the violation of any ordinance; to provide for the recovery, collection,
and enforcement of such fines; and in default of payment to provide for
confinement in the city or county prison or other place of confinement as
may be provided by ordinance;
(26) To prevent immoderate driving on the street;
(27) To establish and maintain public libraries, art galleries, and
museums and to provide the necessary grounds or buildings for such
libraries, galleries, and museums; to purchase books, papers, maps,
manuscripts, works of art, and objects of natural or of scientific
curiosity and instruction for such libraries, galleries, and museums; to
receive donations and bequests of money or property for such libraries,
galleries, and museums in trust or otherwise; and to pass necessary
bylaws and regulations for the protection and government of such
libraries, art galleries, and museums;
(28) To erect, designate, establish, maintain, and regulate
hospitals, houses of correction, jails, station houses, fire engine
houses, asphalt repair plants, and other necessary buildings; to erect,
designate, establish, maintain, and regulate plants for the removal,
disposal, or recycling of garbage and refuse or to make contracts for
garbage and refuse removal, disposal, or recycling, or all of the same;
and to charge equitable fees for such removal, disposal, or recycling, or
all of the same, except as provided by law. The fees collected pursuant
to this subdivision shall be credited to a single fund to be used
exclusively by the city for the removal, disposal, or recycling of
garbage and refuse, or all of the same, including any costs incurred for
collecting the fee. Before any contract for such removal, disposal, or
recycling is let, the city council shall make specifications for such
contract, bids shall be advertised for as now provided by law, and the
-6-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
contract shall be let to the lowest and best bidder, who shall furnish
bond to the city conditioned upon his or her carrying out the terms of
the contract, the bond to be approved by the city council. Nothing in
this section, and no contract or regulation made by the city council,
shall be so construed as to prohibit any person, firm, or corporation
engaged in any business in which garbage or refuse accumulates as a
byproduct from selling, recycling, or otherwise disposing of his, her, or
its garbage or refuse or hauling such garbage or refuse through the
streets and alleys under such uniform and reasonable regulations as the
city council may by ordinance prescribe for the removal and hauling of
garbage or refuse;
(29) To erect and establish market houses and market places and to
provide for the erection of all other useful and necessary buildings for
the use of the city and for the protection and safety of all property
owned by the city. Such market houses, market places, and buildings may
be located on any street, alley, or public ground or on land purchased
for such purpose;
(30) To prohibit the establishment of additional cemeteries within
the limits of the city; to regulate the registration of births and
deaths; to direct the keeping and returning of bills of mortality; and to
impose penalties on physicians, sextons, and others for any default in
the premises;
(31) To provide for the inspection of steam boilers, electric light
appliances, pipefittings, and plumbings; to regulate their erection and
construction; to appoint inspectors; and to declare their powers and
duties, except as otherwise provided by law;
(32) To enact a fire code and regulate the erection of all buildings
and other structures within the corporate limits; to provide for the
removal of any buildings or structures or additions to buildings or
structures erected contrary to such code or regulations and to provide
for the removal of dangerous buildings; but no such code or regulation
-7-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
shall be suspended or modified by resolution, nor shall exceptions be
made by ordinance or resolution in favor of any person, firm, or
corporation or concerning any particular lot or building; to direct that
when any building has been damaged by fire, decay, or otherwise, to the
extent of fifty percent of the value of a similar new building above the
foundation, shall be torn down or removed; to prescribe the manner of
ascertaining such damages and to assess the cost of removal of any
building erected or existing contrary to such code or regulations against
the lot or real estate upon which such building or structure is located
or shall be erected or to collect such costs from the owner of any such
building or structure; and to enforce the collection of such costs by
civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction;
(33) To regulate the construction, use, and maintenance of party
walls, to prescribe and regulate the thickness, strength, and manner of
constructing stone, brick, wood, or other buildings and the size and
shape of brick and other material placed in such buildings; to prescribe
and regulate the construction and arrangement of fire escapes and the
placing of iron and metallic shutters and doors in or on such fire
escapes; to provide for the inspection of elevators; to prescribe,
regulate, and provide for the inspection of all plumbing, pipefitting, or
sewer connections in all houses or buildings now or hereafter erected; to
regulate the size, number, and manner of construction of halls, doors,
stairways, seats, aisles, and passageways of theaters and buildings of a
public character, whether now built or hereafter to be built, so that
there may be convenient, safe, and speedy exit in case of fire; to
prevent the dangerous construction and condition of chimneys, fireplaces,
hearths, stoves, stovepipes, ovens, boilers, and heating appliances used
in or about any building and to cause such appliances to be removed or
placed in safe condition when they are considered dangerous; to prevent
the deposit of ashes in unsafe places and to cause such buildings and
enclosures as may be in a dangerous state to be put in a safe condition;
-8-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
to prevent the disposing of and delivery or use in any building or other
structure of unsuitable building material within the city limits and
provide for the inspection of building materials; to provide for the
abatement of dense volumes of smoke; to regulate the construction of
areaways, stairways, and vaults and to regulate partition fences; and to
enforce proper heating and ventilation of buildings used for schools or
other buildings where large numbers of persons are liable to congregate;
(34) To regulate levees, depots and depot grounds, and places for
storing freight and goods and to provide for and regulate the laying of
tracks and the passage of railways through the streets, alleys, and
public grounds of the city;
(35) To require the lighting of any railway within the city and to
fix and determine the number, size, and style of all fixtures and
apparatus necessary for such lighting and the points of location for such
lampposts. If any company owning or operating such railways shall fail to
comply with such requirements, the city council may cause such lighting
to be done and may assess the expense of such lighting against such
company. Such expense shall constitute a lien upon any real estate
belonging to such company and lying within such city and may be collected
in the same manner as taxes for general purposes;
(36) To provide for necessary publicity and to appropriate money for
the purpose of advertising the resources and advantages of the city;
(37) To erect, establish, and maintain offstreet parking areas on
publicly owned property located beneath any elevated segment of the
National System of Interstate and Defense Highways or portion thereof, or
public property title to which is in the city on May 12, 1971, or
property owned by the city and used in conjunction with and incidental to
city-operated facilities; and to regulate parking on such property by
time limitation devices or by lease;
(38) To acquire, by the exercise of the power of eminent domain or
otherwise, lease, purchase, construct, own, maintain, operate, or
-9-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
contract for the operation of public passenger transportation systems,
excluding taxicabs, transportation network companies and railroad
systems, including all property and facilities required for such public
passenger transportation systems, within and without the limits of the
city; to redeem such property from prior encumbrance in order to protect
or preserve the interest of the city in such property; to exercise all
powers granted by the Constitution of Nebraska and laws of the State of
Nebraska or exercised by or pursuant to a home rule charter adopted
pursuant thereto, including, but not limited to, receiving and accepting
from the government of the United States or any agency thereof, from the
State of Nebraska or any subdivision thereof, and from any person or
corporation donations, devises, gifts, bequests, loans, or grants for or
in aid of the acquisition, operation, and maintenance of such public
passenger transportation systems; to administer, hold, use, and apply
such donations, devises, gifts, bequests, loans, or grants for the
purposes for which such donations, devises, gifts, bequests, loans, or
grants may have been made; to negotiate with employees and enter into
contracts of employment; to employ by contract or otherwise individuals
singularly or collectively; to enter into agreements authorized under the
Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act; to contract
with an operating and management company for the purpose of operating,
servicing, and maintaining any public passenger transportation systems
the city shall acquire; and to exercise such other and further powers as
may be necessary, incident, or appropriate to the powers of the city; and
(39) In addition to powers conferred elsewhere in the laws of the
state, to implement and enforce an air pollution control program within
the corporate limits of the city under subdivision (23) of section
81-1504 or subsection (1) of section 81-1528, which program shall be
consistent with the federal Clean Air Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et
seq. Such powers shall include without limitation those involving
injunctive relief, civil penalties, criminal fines, and burden of proof.
-10-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
Nothing in this section shall preclude the control of air pollution by
resolution, ordinance, or regulation not in actual conflict with state
air pollution control regulations; and .
(40) To require any housing authority in a city of the metropolitan
class to comply with any city rental inspection and registration
ordinance, code enforcement, and inspection of residential rental
properties.
Sec. 2. Section 31-735, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
31-735 (1) On the first Tuesday after the second Monday in September
which is at least fifteen months after the judgment of the district court
creating a sanitary and improvement district and on the first Tuesday
after the second Monday in September each two years thereafter, the board
of trustees shall cause a special election to be held, at which election
a board of trustees shall be elected. The board of trustees shall have
five members except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. Each
member elected to the board of trustees shall be elected to a term of two
years and shall hold office until such member's successor is elected and
qualified. Any person desiring to file for the office of trustee may file
for such office with the election commissioner, or county clerk in
counties having no election commissioner, of the county in which the
greater proportion in area of the district is located not later than
fifty days before the election. If such person will serve on the board of
trustees as a designated representative of a limited partnership, general
partnership, limited liability company, public, private, or municipal
corporation, estate, or trust which owns real estate in the district, the
filing shall indicate that fact and shall include appropriate
documentation evidencing such fact. No filing fee shall be required. A
person filing for the office of trustee to be elected at the election
held four years after the first election of trustees and each election
thereafter shall designate whether such person is a candidate for
-11-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
election by the resident owners of such district or a candidate for
election by all of the owners of real estate located in the district. If
a person filing for the office of trustee is a designated representative
of a limited partnership, a general partnership, a limited liability
company, a public, private, or municipal corporation, an estate, or a
trust which owns real estate in the district, the name of such entity
shall accompany the name of the candidate on the ballot in the following
form: (Name of candidate) to represent (name of entity) as a member of
the board. The name of each candidate shall appear on only one ballot.
The name of a person may be written in and voted for as a candidate
for the office of trustee, and such write-in candidate may be elected to
the office of trustee. A write-in candidate for the office of trustee who
will serve as a designated representative of a limited partnership, a
general partnership, a limited liability company, a public, private, or
municipal corporation, an estate, or a trust which owns real estate in
the district shall not be elected to the office of trustee unless (a)
each vote is accompanied by the name of the entity which the candidate
will represent and (b) within ten days after the date of the election the
candidate provides the election commissioner or county clerk with
appropriate documentation evidencing the candidate's representation of
the entity. Votes cast which do not carry such accompanying designation
shall not be counted.
A trustee shall be an owner of real estate located in the district
or shall be a person designated to serve as a representative on the board
of trustees if the real estate is owned by a limited partnership, a
general partnership, a limited liability company, a public, private, or
municipal corporation, an estate, or a trust. Notice of the date of the
election shall be mailed by the clerk of the district not later than
sixty-five days prior to the election to each person who is entitled to
vote at the election for trustees whose property ownership or lease
giving a right to vote is of record on the records of the register of
-12-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
deeds as of a date designated by the election commissioner or county
clerk, which date shall be not more than eighty days prior to the
election.
(2)(a) For any sanitary and improvement district, a person whose
ownership or right to vote becomes of record or is received after the
date specified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may vote when
such person establishes the right to vote to the satisfaction of the
election board. At the first election and at the election held two years
after the first election, any person may cast one vote for each trustee
for each acre of unplatted land or fraction thereof and one vote for each
platted lot which such person may own in the district.
(b) This subdivision applies to a district until the board of
trustees amends its articles of association pursuant to subdivision (2)
(d) of this section. At the elections election held four years and six
years after the first election of trustees, two members of the board of
trustees shall be elected by the legal property owners resident within
such sanitary and improvement district and three members shall be elected
by all of the owners of real estate located in the district pursuant to
this section. Every resident property owner may cast one vote for a
candidate for each office of trustee to be filled by election of resident
property owners only. Such resident property owners may also each cast
one vote for each acre of unplatted land or fraction thereof and for each
platted lot owned within the district for a candidate for each office of
trustee to be filled by election of all property owners. For each office
of trustee to be filled by election of all property owners of the
district, every legal property owner not resident within such sanitary
and improvement district may cast one vote for each acre of unplatted
land or fraction thereof and one vote for each platted lot which such
legal property owner owns in the district. At the election held eight six
years after the first election of trustees and at each election
thereafter, three members of the board of trustees shall be elected by
-13-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
the legal property owners resident within such sanitary and improvement
district and two members shall be elected by all of the owners of real
estate located in the district pursuant to this section. If there are not
any legal property owners resident within such district or if not less
than ninety percent of the area of the district is owned for other than
residential uses, the five members shall be elected by the legal property
owners of all property within such district as provided in this section.
(c) Any public, private, or municipal corporation owning any land or
lot in the district may vote at an election the same as an individual. If
more than fifty percent of the homes in any sanitary and improvement
district are used as a second, seasonal, or recreational residence, the
owners of such property shall be considered legal property owners
resident within such district for purposes of electing trustees. For
purposes of voting for trustees, each condominium apartment under a
condominium property regime established prior to January 1, 1984, under
the Condominium Property Act or established after January 1, 1984, under
the Nebraska Condominium Act shall be deemed to be a platted lot and the
lessee or the owner of the lessee's interest, under any lease for an
initial term of not less than twenty years which requires the lessee to
pay taxes and special assessments levied on the leased property, shall be
deemed to be the owner of the property so leased and entitled to cast the
vote of such property. When ownership of a platted lot or unplatted land
is held jointly by two or more persons, whether as joint tenants, tenants
in common, limited partners, members of a limited liability company, or
any other form of joint ownership, only one person shall be entitled to
cast the vote of such property. The executor, administrator, guardian, or
trustee of any person or estate interested shall have the right to vote.
No corporation, estate, or irrevocable trust shall be deemed to be a
resident owner for purposes of voting for trustees. Should two or more
persons or officials claim the right to vote on the same tract, the
election board shall determine the party entitled to vote. Such board
-14-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
shall select one of their number chairperson and one of their number
clerk. In case of a vacancy on such board, the remaining trustees shall
fill the vacancy on such board until the next election.
(d) For any sanitary and improvement district which has been in
existence for at least ten years, which has less than seventy property
owners entitled to vote for trustees, which has at least two resident
property owners, and in which less than ten percent of the area of the
district is owned for other than residential uses, the board of trustees
may amend its articles of association as provided in section 31-740.01 to
provide for a reduction in the number of trustees on the board from five
members to three members to be effective at the beginning of the term of
office for the board of trustees elected at the next election. At the
next election and at each election thereafter, two members of the board
of trustees shall be elected by the legal property owners resident within
such sanitary and improvement district and one member shall be elected by
all of the owners of real estate located in the district pursuant to this
section. Every resident property owner may cast one vote for a candidate
for each office of trustee to be filled by election of resident property
owners only. Such resident property owners may also each cast one vote
for each acre of unplatted land or fraction thereof and for each platted
lot owned within the district for a candidate for the office of trustee
to be filled by election of all property owners. For the office of
trustee to be filled by election of all property owners of the district,
every legal property owner not resident within such sanitary and
improvement district may cast one vote for each acre of unplatted land or
fraction thereof and one vote for each platted lot which such legal
property owner owns in the district.
(3) The election commissioner or county clerk shall hold any
election required by subsection (1) of this section by sealed mail ballot
by notifying the board of trustees on or before July 1 of a given year.
The election commissioner or county clerk shall, at least twenty days
-15-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
prior to the election, mail a ballot and return envelope to each person
who is entitled to vote at the election and whose property ownership or
lease giving a right to vote is of record with the register of deeds as
of the date designated by the election commissioner or county clerk,
which date shall not be more than eighty days prior to the election. The
ballot and return envelope shall include: (a) The names and addresses of
the candidates; (b) room for write-in candidates; and (c) instructions on
how to vote and return the ballot. Such ballots shall be returned in the
return envelope to the election commissioner or county clerk no later
than 5 p.m. on the date set for the election. If the ballot is not
returned in the return envelope, such ballot shall not be counted. If
more than one ballot is included in the same return envelope, such
ballots shall not be counted and shall be reinserted into the return
envelope which shall be resealed and marked rejected.
Sec. 3. Section 31-752, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
31-752 (1) The board of trustees or the administrator shall not
assess real property that is (a) not assessable or (b) not included
within the corporate boundaries of the district for any of the
improvements that are constructed or installed outside of the corporate
boundaries of the district, except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section.
(2) The board of trustees or the administrator shall not assess real
property that has not been specially benefited by any public improvements
constructed or installed by the district that are located outside of the
corporate boundaries of the district.
(3) In cases where (a) real property is not assessable or (b) real
property located outside the corporate boundaries of the district has
been specially benefited by the improvements constructed or installed by
the district outside of the corporate boundaries of the district cause to
be assessed for any of the improvements herein provided, property by law
-16-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
not assessable, or property not included within the district defined in
the preliminary resolution, and shall not assess property not benefited;
Provided, in cases when such exempt property has been specially benefited
by the improvements, the owner of such property shall pay the district a
sum equivalent to the amount the property has been specially benefited,
which amount may be recovered by the district in an action against the
property owner. If the parties do not agree as to the amount of the
special benefits, the amount may be determined by the district court in
an action brought by the district for such purpose.
(4) The board of trustees or the administrator may determine find
that any part or all of such public improvements made are of general
benefit to the district, in which case the board or administrator shall
have the power to except that the board or administrator shall levy
special assessments on all lots, parcels, or pieces of real estate
specially benefited to the extent that any such public improvements
constructed or installed by the district confer of the special benefits
to such real property. The cost of such improvements installed or
constructed outside of the corporate boundaries of the district may shall
be paid from the taxes assessments levied against all the real property
within the corporate boundaries of in the district, in the manner
provided by section 31-755, or may be paid from unappropriated money in
its general fund, or may be paid from the collection of special
assessments levied against all lots, parcels, or pieces of real property
located outside of the corporate boundaries of the district to the extent
of the special benefit conferred. The cost of the improvements shall draw
interest and shall be payable in the same manner as special assessments
levied against all real property located within the corporate boundaries
of the district in accordance with section 31-753 at the rate of six
percent per annum from the date of acceptance thereof by the board or
administrator until warrants are issued in payment of the contract price.
Sec. 4. Section 71-1572, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-17-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
71-1572 Sections 71-1572 to 71-15,170 and section 6 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Housing Agency Act.
Sec. 5. Section 71-15,169, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-15,169 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Bed bug means a member of the Cimicidae family of parasitic
insects; and
(b) Pest control professional means a person licensed as a
commercial applicator under the Pesticide Act.
(2) A housing agency for a city of the metropolitan class shall have
the following responsibilities relating to bed bugs:
(a) Prior to renting a dwelling unit, the agency shall visually
inspect the unit for any evidence of the presence of bed bugs, which may
be indicated by observation of a living bed bug, bed bug carapace, eggs
or egg casings, or brownish or blood spotting on linens, mattresses, or
furniture;
(b) The agency shall not show, rent, or lease to a prospective
tenant any vacant dwelling unit that the agency knows or reasonably
suspects has a current bed bug infestation;
(c) Prior to renting a dwelling unit, the agency shall disclose to a
prospective tenant if an adjacent unit or units are currently infested
with or are being treated for bed bugs; and
(d) The agency shall be responsible for the costs of investigating
and remediating any bed bug infestation.
(3) A housing agency for a city of the metropolitan class shall
establish a complaint process. Any resident of an agency property may
file a complaint by any of the following means:
(a) A complaint form filled out online on the housing agency's
website;
(b) A telephone call made to a housing agency; or
-18-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
(c) A complaint form filled out in person. Such complaint form shall
be made available at designated offices.
(4) (2) The complaint form, whether completed by the complainant
online, in-person, or by a housing agency employee answering a telephone
call complaint, shall include the following information:
(a) The name of the complainant;
(b) Contact information including the telephone number, email
address, and mailing address of the complainant;
(c) The nature of the complaint, including, but not limited to,
whether a maintenance issue, a discrimination claim, or a rent dispute;
and
(d) Relevant dates.
(5) (3) Notice of the right to file a complaint up until the time of
an eviction shall be included on both the online and printed complaint
form.
(6) (4) The complainant may provide any supporting documentation
with the complaint, including, but not limited to, photographs or digital
images, receipts, and correspondence.
(7) (5) Upon receipt of the complaint, the agency shall send an
acknowledgment to the complainant by email or regular first-class mail
within five business days. Each complaint shall be assigned a unique case
number for tracking purposes.
(8)(a) (6) The agency shall conduct a thorough investigation of the
complaint, including, but not limited to, interviewing relevant parties,
inspecting property and relevant documents, and reviewing applicable laws
and regulations.
(b) Throughout the investigation, the agency shall provide the
complainant with regular updates on the status of the complaint by email,
telephone, or regular first-class mail.
(c) The agency shall provide tenants with reasonable notice in
advance of entering a dwelling unit for purposes of investigating
-19-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
complaints, including for inspection, bed bug remediation, or monitoring
in connection with a bed bug complaint.
(9)(a) For any complaint involving an actual or suspected bed bug
infestation:
(i) The agency shall perform an inspection or obtain investigatory
services from a pest control professional within ten days after receiving
the complaint. The inspection or investigatory services shall include any
unit directly adjacent to, above, or below the dwelling unit or common
area from which the original complaint came; and
(ii) Upon a determination of a bed bug infestation, the agency
shall:
(A) Provide all tenants of units affected by the complaint with
notice of the agency's or pest control professional's determination in
connection with such unit within ten days after such determination is
made;
(B) Obtain and provide remedial services from a pest control
professional within twenty-one days after receipt of the complaint; and
(C) Maintain a written record of the complaint and any control
measures provided, including any report of chemicals applied and other
remedies provided by the pest control professional. Such records shall be
maintained for two years.
(b) For all other complaints:
(i) (7) The agency housing authority shall resolve the complaint
within fourteen days after receipt of the complaint. If additional time
is required, the complainant shall be notified and provided with an
updated timeline; and . Throughout the investigation, the agency shall
provide the complainant with regular updates on the status of the
complaint by email, telephone, or regular first-class mail.
(ii) (8) The agency shall notify the complainant of the resolution
of the complaint in writing within five business days after such
resolution. The notice shall include (A) (a) a summary of the
-20-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
investigation findings, (B) (b) the action taken to address the
complaint, (C) (c) any remedies or compensation provided, (D) (d)
information on how to file a complaint with the political subdivision
responsible for code enforcement, if applicable, and (E) (e) information
about the city's complaint process if the complainant is not satisfied
with the resolution of the complaint.
(10) (9) The agency shall invite the complainant to provide feedback
on the complainant's experience with the complaint process, including
suggestions for improvement.
(11) (10) The agency shall monitor complaint trends, analyze root
causes, and report on complaint resolution statistics regularly to
identify areas for improvement. The agency shall submit a report to the
commissioners at every board meeting detailing (a) the number of
complaints filed, (b) the nature of such complaints, (c) the status of
completed and pending inspections, and (d) the number of unfilled
inspector positions within the housing agency. The report shall also be
made available to the public on the agency's website and at the agency's
office.
(12) (11) The agency shall inform persons applying for housing about
the complaint process during the resident application process and inform
residents about the complaint process (a) annually, (b) at the time a
complaint is filed, and (c) by posting on the agency's website and on any
public boards in any common housing spaces.
Sec. 6. A housing agency for a city of the metropolitan class shall
submit a report every six months to such city of the metropolitan class
and to the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature. The report shall
include:
(1) Information regarding any pest control management activities
undertaken during the six-month period covered by the report;
(2) The number of eviction filings during the six-month period
covered by the report;
-21-

LB287 LB287
2025 2025
(3) The number and nature of complaints or grievances filed during
the six-month period covered by the report and their resolutions;
(4) Current vacancy rates; and
(5) Any relevant updates from meetings of the agency's board of
commissioners.
Sec. 7. Sections 1, 4, 5, 6, and 9 of this act become operative
three calendar months after the adjournment of this legislative session.
The other sections of this act become operative on their effective date.
Sec. 8. Original section 31-752, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 31-735, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
Sec. 9. Original sections 14-102, 71-1572, and 71-15,169, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 10. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-22-